Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-226
County fair board; expenses of members; compensation of secretary.

The members of the county fair board, other than the secretary if he or she is selected from the board members, shall receive no pay for their services but shall be paid all necessary expenses. The secretary shall receive such salary payable at such times as the county fair board may provide.

Laws 1917, c. 168, § 7, p. 378;

C.S.1922, § 63;

C.S.1929, § 2-216;

R.S.1943, § 2-226;

Laws 1999, LB 437, § 7.